District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

32-1037

Issuance of revised wage orders; notice and hearing; notice and effective date of orders; contents of orders; restrictions

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 9-248, § 18, 40 DCR 761

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 36-201 to 36-219.